Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4017.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 33, chapter 16, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 33-1816.01, to read: START_STATUTE33-1816.01. Pets; ownership limits prohibited; rules A. NOTWITHSTANDING any provision in the community documents, an association shall not prohibit or otherwise limit a household pet by breed, size or weight.  Any provisions prohibited by this subsection are unenforceable without regard to whether the provisions were adopted or enacted before the effective date of this section. B. An association may adopt reasonable rules regarding pet behavior that are CONSISTENT with federal, state and local laws. END_STATUTE